Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-17] Enforcement by state and county
authorities. All state and county health authorities and police officers
shall enforce this chapter and the rules and orders of the department. [L 1989,
c 212, pt of §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under
Hawai‘i Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next